Washington, session 2025-2026, HB2568.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:Sec. 1. RCW 41.05.017 and 2025 c 389 s 3 and 2025 c 171 s 2 are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:Each health plan that provides medical insurance offered under this chapter, including plans created by insuring entities, plans not subject to the provisions of Title 48 RCW, and plans created under RCW 41.05.140, are subject to the provisions of RCW 48.43.500, 70.02.045, 48.43.505 through 48.43.535, 48.43.537, 48.43.545, 48.43.550, 70.02.110, 70.02.900, 48.43.190, 48.43.083, 48.43.0128, 48.43.780, 48.43.435, 48.43.815, 48.200.020 through 48.200.280, 48.200.300 through 48.200.320, 48.43.440, 48.43.840, 48.43.845, 48.43.732, and chapter 48.49 RCW.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 2. Section 1 of this act takes effect January 1, 2027.--- END ---